District of Columbia statutes.
19-1302.02

Jurisdiction over trustee and beneficiary.

(a)

By accepting the trusteeship of a trust having its principal place of administration in the District of Columbia or by moving the principal place of administration to the District of Columbia, the trustee submits personally to the jurisdiction of the courts of the District of Columbia regarding any matter involving the trust.

(b)

With respect to their interests in the trust, the beneficiaries of a trust having its principal place of administration in the District of Columbia are subject to the jurisdiction of the courts of the District of Columbia regarding any matter involving the trust. By accepting a distribution from such a trust, the recipient submits personally to the jurisdiction of the courts of the District of Columbia regarding any matter involving the trust.

(c)

This section does not preclude other methods of obtaining jurisdiction over a trustee, beneficiary, or other person receiving property from the trust.

Mar. 10, 2004, D.C. Law 15-104, § 2(b), 51 DCR 208

History

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 202 of the Uniform Trust Code.

Editor's Notes